North Dakota, session 69, HB1028.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 48-01.2-20 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. A governing body electing to utilize a construction management at-risk delivery
process for a proposed public improvement shall create a selection committee
composed of:
a. An administrative individual from the governing body.
b. A registered architect, excluding any architect contracted for the project.
c. A registered engineer, excluding any engineer contracted for the project.
d. A licensed contractor.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Subdivision f of subsection 5 of section 48-01.2-20 of the North
Dakota Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
f. The person's fees and expenses for the entire project, which must be identified
on a standard bid form approved by the director of the office of management and
budget and issued by the governing body for the project;
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Subsection 6 of section 48-01.2-20 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
Page No. 1 25.0375.05000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
6. The selection committee shall evaluate each submission based on the qualification
criteria under subsection 5 without modifying the qualification criteria and shall include
the numeric scoring of each criteria item on a weighted basis, with. Excluding the
person's fees and expenses, which must be weighted no less than twenty percent, no
item beingmay be weighted at more than twenty percent and no less than five percent.
The weighting of the qualification criteria must be done in a manner to ensure no
subjective bias and encourage the maximum participation of qualified construction
managers at-risk. Each member of the selection committee shall apply the same
weighting of qualification criteria for a project.
SECTION 4. AMENDMENT. Section 48-01.2-22 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
48-01.2-22. Subcontractor bids.
1. An agency construction manager selected for a public improvement shall publicly
advertise pursuant to section 48 - 01.2 - 04 and publicly open bids pursuant to section
48 - 01.2 - 07 from subcontractors for the work items necessary to complete the general
construction portions of the improvement. The agency construction manager shall
evaluate the bids and award the subcontract to the lowest responsible bidder. The
governing body may influence the selection of the subcontractors, but only insofar as
the governing body's past experience with a subcontractor or a current legal dispute
with a subcontractor.
2. A construction manager at-risk selected for a public improvement shall publicly
advertise pursuant to section 48 - 01.2 - 04 and publicly open bids pursuant to section
48 - 01.2 - 07 from subcontractors for the work items the construction manager at-risk
chooses not to performnecessary to complete the general construction portions of the
improvement. A construction manager a t - risk must submit a bid for any work item
necessary to complete the general construction portions of the improvement the
construction manager a t - risk chooses to perform pursuant to this section . The
construction manager at-risk then shall evaluate the bids and determine which is the
most responsibleaward the subcontract to the lowest responsible bidder. The
governing body may influence the selection of the subcontractors, but only insofar as
Page No. 2 25.0375.05000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
the governing body's past experience with a subcontractor or a current legal dispute
with a subcontractor.
SECTION 5. AMENDMENT. Subsection 5 of section 54-44.7-03 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
5. a. The agency selection committee shall evaluate each of the persons or firms
interviewed on the basis of the following criteria:
a. (1) Past performance.
b. (2) The ability of professional personnel.
c. (3) Willingness to meet time and budget requirements.
d. (4) Location, with higher priority given to firms headquartered in North Dakota.
e. (5) Recent, current, and projected workloads of the persons or firms.
f. (6) Related experience on similar projects.
g. (7) Recent and current work for the agency.
(8) Fees and expenses for the entire project, which must be identified on a
standard information submission form approved by the director of the office
of management and budget and issued by the agency selection committee
for the project.
b. This subdivision does not apply to:
(1) Section 24-02-07.3, unless the project is on the state capitol grounds and
exclusively involves state funds; or
(2) A project involving federal funds when the use of such funds prohibit this
criteria.
c. Based upon these evaluations, the agency selection committee shall select the
three which, in its judgment, are most qualified, ranking the three in priority order.
The agency selection committee's report ranking the interviewed persons or firms
must be in writing and must include data substantiating its determinations. This
data must be available to the public upon written request.
Page No. 3 25.0375.05000